Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1278
Field notes or plat of county surveyor; when admissible.

A copy of the field notes of any county surveyor, or a plat made by him and certified under oath as correct, may be received as evidence to show the shape or dimensions of a tract of land, or any other fact whose ascertainment requires only the exercise of scientific skill or calculation.

R.S.1867, Code § 407, p. 461;

R.S.1913, § 7971;

C.S.1922, § 8912;

C.S.1929, § 20-1278;

R.S.1943, § 25-1278.

For other provisions for county surveyor's certificate, see section 23-1904.

Field notes of county surveyor are admissible. Worm v. Crowell, 165 Neb. 713, 87 N.W.2d 384 (1958).

Field notes and plats of original surveys are presumptively correct and government field notes are admissible. Peterson v. Skjelver, 43 Neb. 663, 62 N.W. 43 (1895); Woods v. West, 40 Neb. 307, 58 N.W. 938 (1894).